Utah statutes.
41-6a-1005.   Passing closed railroad or bridge gate or barrier prohibited.
A pedestrian may not pass through, around, over, under, or remain on a
crossing gate or barrier at a railroad crossing or bridge while the gate or
barrier is closed or is being opened or closed.
